Maryland, session 2026, SB0732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
1–3A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the Office of Social
Equity.
(c) “Fund” means the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund.
(d) “Office” means the Office of Social Equity.
1–3A–03.
(a) (1) There is a Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund.
(2) The purpose of the Fund is to provide funds to community–based
organizations that serve communities determined by the Office, in consultation with the
Office of the Attorney General, to have been the most impacted by disproportionate
enforcement of the cannabis prohibition before July 1, 2022.
(3) The Comptroller shall administer the Fund.
(4) (i) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(5) The Fund consists of:
(i) sales and use tax revenue distributed to the Fund under §
2–1302.2 of the Tax – General Article;
(ii) conversion fees paid by businesses under § 36–403 of this article;
and
(iii) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund, in accordance with any conditions adopted by the Comptroller for the
acceptance of donations or gifts to the Fund.
(6) (i) The Fund may be used only for:

SENATE BILL 732 3
1. funding community–based initiatives intended to benefit
low–income communities, including:
A. behavioral health crisis response services;
B. education and after–school programs;
C. truancy and absenteeism intervention programs;
D. housing and homelessness prevention initiatives;
E. transportation improvements in high–density areas that
have public transportation;
F. job training and workforce development programs;
G. community child care and recreational services; and
H. programs that benefit individuals and families impacted
by incarceration;
2. funding community–based initiatives that serve
disproportionately impacted areas, as defined in § 36–101 of this article; and
3. any related administrative expenses incurred by a local
government in administering the funds that do not exceed 15% of the funds received in the
fiscal year.
(ii) Money may not be expended from the Fund for law enforcement
agencies or activities.
(iii) Money expended from the Fund is supplemental to and may not
supplant funding that otherwise would be appropriated for preexisting local government
programs.
(7) (i) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.
(ii) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
(8) No part of the Fund may revert or be credited to:
(i) the General Fund of the State; or
(ii) any other special fund of the State.

SENATE BILL 732
(9) The Comptroller shall pay out money from the Fund.
(10) The Fund is subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits as
provided for in § 2–1220 of the State Government Article.
(b) (1) (I) [Based] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, BASED on the percentage allocable to each county determined by the
Office, the Comptroller shall distribute funds from the Fund to each county in an amount
that, for the period from July 1, 2002, to January 1, 2023, both inclusive, is proportionate
to the total number of cannabis possession charges in the county compared to the total
number of cannabis possession charges in the State.
(II) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE FUNDS FROM THE
FUND ALLOCABLE TO BALTIMORE CITY UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH TO THE BALTIMORE CITY COMPTROLLER, WHO SHALL ADMINISTER
AND DISTRIBUTE THE FUNDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) For any distribution of funds [to a county] under paragraph (1) of this
subsection[,]:
(I) the county shall hold the funds separately from other revenue
and general funds; AND
(II) THE BALTIMORE CITY COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE
THE FUNDS TO A SPECIAL FUND ESTABLISHED BY THE BALTIMORE CITY
COMPTROLLER UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) [Subject] EXCEPT FOR BALTIMORE CITY AND SUBJECT to the
limitations under subsection (a)(6) of this section, each county shall adopt a law
establishing the purpose for which money received from the Fund may be used.
(c) (1) The Office shall require each county, OTHER THAN BALTIMORE CITY,
AND THE BALTIMORE CITY COMPTROLLER to develop a plan for the distribution of
funds to community–based organizations for use in accordance with this section.
(2) The plan developed by a county AND THE BALTIMORE CITY
COMPTROLLER shall be:
(i) established before distributing funds under this section;
(ii) developed in consultation with stakeholders; and
(iii) the subject of a public hearing before finalizing the plan.

SENATE BILL 732 5
(3) On or before October 1, 2025, the Office shall adopt regulations to carry
out this section.
(d) On or before October 1, 2026, and each October 1 thereafter, each county,
OTHER THAN BALTIMORE CITY, AND THE BALTIMORE CITY COMPTROLLER shall
submit a report to the Office on:
(1) the amount of funds received from the Fund under subsection (b)(1) of
this section;
(2) the organizations that received funding from the county OR THE
BALTIMORE CITY COMPTROLLER under this section;
(3) the methods used by the county OR THE BALTIMORE CITY
COMPTROLLER to solicit, review, and select organizations that may be eligible for funding
under this section; and
(4) administrative expenses related to the county’s OR THE BALTIMORE
CITY COMPTROLLER’S administration and distribution of the funds received under
subsection (b)(1) of this section.
1–3A–04.
(A) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 1–3A–03 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE BALTIMORE CITY COMPTROLLER SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A SPECIAL ACCOUNT TO BE USED ONLY FOR HOLDING
FUNDS ALLOCATED FROM THE FUND;
(2) DEPOSIT EACH QUARTERLY ALLOCATION FROM THE FUND TO THE
SPECIAL ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(3) DISTRIBUTE THE ALLOCATION OF FUNDS FROM THE FUND TO BE
USED ONLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–3A–03(A)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE SPECIAL ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF
THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO AUDIT BY THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE AUDITS AS
PROVIDED FOR IN § 2–1220 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.